Utah statutes.
53A-6-801.   Definition.

As used in this part, "paraeducator" means a school employee who:

(1)  delivers instruction under the direct supervision of a teacher; and

(2)  works in an area where there is a shortage of qualified teachers, such as special education, Title I, ESL, reading remediation, math, or science.



Enacted by Chapter 144, 2008 General Session

